District of Columbia statutes.
31-5602.04

Post-licensing requirements.

(a)

(1)

A licensed broker-dealer shall make and keep such accounts, correspondence, memoranda, papers, books, and other records as the Commissioner may, by rule, require.

(2)

The authority of the Commissioner to adopt rules under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be subject to the limitations of section 15 of the Securities Exchange Act 1934 [15 U.S.C. § 78o].

(3)

A licensed investment adviser shall make and keep such accounts, correspondence, memoranda, papers, books, and other records as the Commissioner may by rule require.

(4)

The authority of the Commissioner to adopt rules under paragraph (3) of this subsection shall be subject to the limitations of section 222 of the Investment Advisers Act of 1940 [15 U.S.C. § 80b-18a].

(b)

(1)

With respect to investment advisers, the Commissioner may, by rule or order, require that certain information be furnished or disseminated as appropriate in the public interest or for the protection of investors and advisory clients.

(2)

Information furnished to clients or prospective clients of a licensed investment adviser that complies with the Investment Advisers Act of 1940 and the rules promulgated under that Act may be used in whole or partial satisfaction of the requirement in paragraph (1) of this subsection.

(c)

A licensed broker-dealer or investment adviser shall file such financial reports as the Commissioner may, by rule or order, prescribe, except as provided by section 15 of the Securities Exchange Act 1934 [15 U.S.C. § 78o] in the case of a broker-dealer and section 222 of the Investment Advisers Act of 1940 [15 U.S.C. § 80b-18a] in the case of an investment adviser.

(d)

If the information contained in any document filed with the Commissioner is, or becomes, inaccurate or incomplete in any material respect, a licensed broker-dealer or investment adviser shall promptly file a correcting amendment with the Commissioner, and a federal covered adviser shall file a correcting amendment when required to do so with the Securities and Exchange Commission.

Oct. 26, 2000, D.C. Law 13-203, § 204, 47 DCR 7837
This section is referenced in § 31-5607.03.